Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.185

Causing person to violate rule or regulation.

Any person who knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to cause any person to violate any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 1991 c 261 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 9.]